New York, session 2025-2026, S3614.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 209 of the tax law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 13 to read as follows: 3 13. A minority depository institution as defined by section 308 of the 4 federal Financial Institution Reform, Recovery, and Enforcement Act of 5 1989, shall be exempt from taxation under the provisions of this article 6 for a period of ten years from the date such minority depository insti- 7 tution commences doing business. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to tax 9 years commencing on and after January 1, 2026. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08083-01-5